Rhode Island, session 2025, SB694.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 5-34 of the General Laws entitled "Nurses" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following section:
5-34-3.1. Safe administration of sedation.
(a) Registered nurses (RNs) and advanced practice registered nurses (APRNs), other than
licensed certified registered nurse anesthetists (CRNAs), as defined in this chapter, and RNs
enrolled in a nurse anesthesiology training program approved by the Council on Accreditation of
Nurse Anesthesia Educational programs (COA) or its predecessors or successors, shall not
administer agents that are primarily used and classified as general anesthetics for minimal,
moderate, deep sedation, or general anesthesia including, propofol, Etomidate, sodium thiopental,
methohexital, or volatile gases (e.g. sevoflurane, isoflurane, desflurane), nor shall any RN or Non-
CRNA APRN administer or manage deep sedation or general anesthesia for any diagnostic,
therapeutic, or surgical procedures using any drug or medication.
(b) For critical life-saving situations requiring the immediate and emergent facilitation of
airway management (rapid sequence intubation) or to maintain sedation for tracheally intubated
and mechanically ventilated patients, an RN acting as the third hand of a licensed APRN or
physician, or an APRN may initiate, titrate, and bolus intravenous/intraosseous (IV/IO) agents. An
APRN, may initiate, titrate, and bolus intravenous/intraosseous (IV/IO) agents if the APRN is
trained in airway management and acting within their scope of practice and approved by their
governing body, as authorized in this section.

(c) For emergency situations where there is an imminent threat to life or limb, the APRN
or RN can administer anesthetic medications to preserve patient life including, but not limited to,
cardiac arrest, and respiratory failure, acting within their scope of practice and approved by their
governing body.
(d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the administration and/or titration of anesthetics
for patients being sedated in a critical care setting (emergency room, intensive care unit) and are
tracheally intubated, and mechanically ventilated by a RN or APRN acting within the scope of
practice and approved by their governing body.
SECTION 2. Chapter 5-34.2 of the General Laws entitled "Nurse Anesthetists" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
5-34.2-2.1. Safe administration of sedation.
(a) Registered nurses (RNs) and advanced practice registered nurses (APRNs), other than
licensed certified registered nurse anesthetists (CRNAs), as defined in this chapter, and RNs
enrolled in a nurse anesthesiology training program approved by the Council on Accreditation of
Nurse Anesthesia Educational programs (COA) or its predecessors or successors, shall not
administer agents that are primarily used and classified as general anesthetics for minimal,
moderate, deep sedation, or general anesthesia including, propofol, Etomidate, sodium thiopental,
methohexital, or volatile gases (e.g. sevoflurane, isoflurane, desflurane), nor shall any RN or Non-
CRNA APRN administer or manage deep sedation or general anesthesia for any diagnostic,
therapeutic, or surgical procedures using any drug or medication.
(b) For critical life-saving situations requiring the immediate and emergent facilitation of
airway management (rapid sequence intubation) or to maintain sedation for tracheally intubated
and mechanically ventilated patients, an RN acting as the third hand of a licensed APRN or
physician, or an APRN may initiate, titrate, and bolus intravenous/intraosseous (IV/IO) agents. An
APRN, may initiate, titrate, and bolus intravenous/intraosseous (IV/IO) agents if the APRN is
trained in airway management and acting within their scope of practice and approved by their
governing body, as authorized in this section.
(c) For emergency situations where there is an imminent threat to life or limb, the APRN
or RN can administer anesthetic medications to preserve patient life including, but not limited to,
cardiac arrest, and respiratory failure, acting within their scope of practice and approved by their
governing body.
(d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the administration and/or titration of anesthetics
for patients being sedated in a critical care setting (emergency room, intensive care unit) and are
tracheally intubated, and mechanically ventilated by a RN or APRN acting within the scope of
LC002337/SUB A - Page 2 of 4

practice and approved by their governing body.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002337/SUB A
========
LC002337/SUB A - Page 3 of 4